DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

DI-773

DI192-37

TC Terminal Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

DTC output mode is set by connecting terminal TC and CG of the DLCS3 the airbag sensor assembly.
The DTCs are displayed by blinking the SRS warning light.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
If the DTC is not displayed, do the following troubleshooting.

1 Does SRS warning light light up for approx. 6 seconds?

CHECK:
Check operation of the SRS warning light after ignition switch

@LOCK @ ON is turned from LOCK position to ON position.

'l
ABO0117 ABO119 4 \

H20916 H21240

(See page DI-768)

N0> Check SRS warning light system.

YES
~_—

2 | Check voltage between terminal TC and CG of DLC3.

ON PREPARATION:
@ Turn the ignition switch to ON.
CcG CHECK:
= Measure the voltage between terminal TC and CG of DLC3.
(LRI OK. g
TR =

Vol 4 -14V
= oltage

AB0119
H10688 H10654
0K> Go to step 4.
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Check voltage between terminal TC of DLC3 and body ground.

ABO119
H10689

H10656
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CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the body ground and terminal TC
of DLCS.
OK:
Voltage:4 -14V

OK Check harness between terminal CG of DLC3
and body ground.

4

Check airbag sensor assembly.

LOCK

H01302
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Airbag Sensor Assembly
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PREPARATION:

(@) Turntheignition switchto LOCK.

(b) Disconnectthenegative (  -) terminal cable fromthe bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Disconnect the airbag sensor assembly connector.

(d) Insert the service wire into terminal TC from back side as
shown in the illustration.

(e) Connect the airbag sensor assembly connector with ser-
vice wire.

(f) Connectthe negative (  -) terminal cable tothe battery.

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON and wait at least for 20 se-
conds.

(h)  Connect the service wire of terminal TC to body ground.

CHECK:

Check operation of SRS warning light.

OK:
SRS waning light comes on.

NOTICE:

Pay due attention to the terminal connecting position to

avoid a malfunction.

sembly and DLC3.

0K> Check harness between the airbag sensor as-

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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If the DTC is displayed without a DTC check procedure, perform the following
troubleshooting.

1 Checkresistance betweenterminal TC of airbag sensorassembly and body
ground.

LOCK Airbag Sensor Assembly PREPARATIO_N:_ _ _
(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.
@ D [ij D (b) Disconnectnegative (  -)terminal cable fromthe battery,

and wait at least for 90 seconds.

TC (c) Disconnectthe airbag sensor assembly connector.

CHECK:

Check resistance between terminal TC of the airbag sensor as-
sembly connector and body ground.

AB0O119 .
H01304 H01305 %

@

Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.
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